Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB783.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle dealer issued a dealer plate[licensed] under KRS 186.070 who sells a vehicle to a person
who will title and register the vehicle for use upon the highways of this state or another state shall equip the
vehicle with:
(a) The buyer's existing Kentucky license plate, if the customer traded in a vehicle bearing that plate and
the vehicle will be titled and registered in Kentucky. The cost of this temporary use of the existing
plate shall be three dollars ($3), of which the clerk shall retain two dollars ($2). This cost shall not
replace any other fees for reissuance of the existing plate at registration of the purchased vehicle; or
(b) A temporary tag executed in the manner prescribed in this section and in Sections 2 and 3 of this
Act[below], which shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date the vehicle is delivered to the
purchaser. The cost of the tag shall be three dollars ($3)[two dollars ($2)], of which the clerk shall
retain two dollars ($2)[one dollar ($1)].
(2) (a) A motor vehicle dealer who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section[licensed under
KRS 186.070] shall:
1. Apply to the county clerk of the county in which the dealer maintains his or her principal place
of business for issuance of temporary tags; and
2. Not apply to the county clerk of any other county unless granted permission by the Motor
Vehicle Commission.
(b) When applying for temporary tags, a motor vehicle dealer:
1. Shall report the number of sales in the previous year;
2. Shall be limited to an initial purchase of temporary tags of no more than one hundred twenty-
five percent (125%) of the number of sales in the previous year; and
3. May provide the Motor Vehicle Commission with evidence of sales in excess of eighty-five
percent (85%) of the number of tags received under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, and
the Motor Vehicle Commission may allow the dealer to purchase additional temporary tags.
(c) A motor vehicle dealer shall make application[ shall be made] for temporary[such] tags on forms
supplied to the county clerk by the Transportation Cabinet.
(3)[(2)] The county clerk of any county who receives a proper application for issuance of temporary tags shall
record the number of each tag issued upon the application of the dealer for temporary[such] tags, or if a group
of consecutively numbered temporary tags are issued to a dealer in connection with a single application, record
the beginning and ending numbers of the group on the application.
(4)[(3)] The clerk shall retain, for a period of two (2) years, one (1) copy of the dealer's temporary tag
application, and ensure that it reflects the numbers appearing on the tags issued with respect to the[such]
application. These copies may be kept by the county clerk in an electronic format.
(5)[(4)] If the owner of a motor vehicle submits to the county clerk a properly completed application for
Kentucky certificate of title and registration pursuant to KRS 186A.120, any motor vehicle required to be
registered and titled in Kentucky, that is not currently registered and titled in Kentucky, may be equipped with
a temporary tag, which shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date of issuance, issued by the county clerk
for the purpose of operating the vehicle in Kentucky while assembling the necessary documents in order to
title and register the vehicle in Kentucky. The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate[establish]
administrative regulations governing this section.
(6)[(5)] The county clerk may issue a temporary tag to the owner of a motor vehicle that is currently registered
and titled in Kentucky. A temporary tag authorized by this subsection shall be used for emergency or unusual
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
purposes as determined by the clerk for the purpose of maintaining the owner's current registration. A
temporary tag authorized by this subsection may only be issued by the county clerk and shall be valid for a
period of between twenty-four (24) hours and seven (7) days, as determined is necessary by the clerk. A
county clerk shall not issue a temporary tag authorized by this subsection unless the owner of the motor
vehicle applying for the tag presents proof of motor vehicle insurance pursuant to KRS 304.39-080. [On and
after January 1, 2006, ]If the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS 304.39-087, proof of
insurance shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS 186A.042. A temporary tag issued
pursuant to this subsection shall not be reissued by the county clerk for the same owner and same motor
vehicle within one (1) year of issuance of a temporary tag.
Section 2. KRS 186A.105 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Motor vehicle dealers, their agents and county clerks, before equipping a vehicle with a temporary tag, shall
print or stamp in waterproof ink, legibly, in the spaces provided on the[such] tag:
(a) The month, day and year the vehicle was delivered to the purchaser;
(b) The month, day and year of expiration of the tag which shall be no more than sixty (60) days following
the date of delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser;
(c) The purchaser's or owner's name;
(d) The year model, make and vehicle identification number of the vehicle sold; and
(e) Either the dealer's name, city of principal place of business and the telephone number, including
telephone area code, or the clerk's name, county and telephone number, including area code.
(2) (a) The dealer's employee who executes the temporary tag shall place his or her signature in the space
provided.
(b) A dealer who issues, or whose agents issue, temporary tags shall:
1. Keep a log of each temporary tag obtained and each tag issued, legibly showing all information
entered by the dealer or dealer's agent on forms supplied by the cabinet. These records may be
kept in an electronic format;
2. Organize the log in sequential order by the date the tags are issued;
3. Maintain the[, and shall make such] log at the dealer's principal place of business and make it
available for inspection by any law enforcement officer or authorized agent of the Motor
Vehicle Commission upon request;[.]
4. Retain any temporary tags which have been voided as part of the log; and
5. Retain the log[ shall be retained by the dealer] for a period of at least two (2) years following the
date of issuance of the last dated tags whose issuance is indicated on any individual temporary
tag log sheet. These records may be kept in an electronic format.
(3) The county clerk who executes the temporary tag shall place his or her signature in the space provided. A
county clerk who issues temporary tags shall keep a log of each temporary tag obtained and each tag issued,
showing all information entered by the county clerk on forms supplied by the cabinet, and shall make the log
available for inspection by any law enforcement officer upon request. The log shall be retained by the county
clerk for a period of at least two (2) years following the date of issuance of the last dated tags whose issuance
is indicated on any individual temporary tag log sheet. The log required under this subsection may be kept by
the county clerk in an electronic format.
Section 3. KRS 186A.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle dealer, salesperson, or agent shall not:
(a) Issue a temporary tag prior to sale of the vehicle on which the tag is placed by the dealer;
(b) Issue a temporary tag to a vehicle that has any title that signifies it is not legally eligible for highway
use;
(c) Issue more than one (1) temporary tag to the same vehicle;
(d) Supply temporary tags to another dealership;
(e) Copy or reuse any temporary tag for issuance to more than one (1) vehicle;

CHAPTER 70 3
(f) Fail to return any unissued temporary tags to the county clerk when a dealership ceases operations;
or
(g) Fail to comply with the issuance requirements and recordkeeping provisions of Section 2 of this Act.
(2) Both the dealer and the dealer's salesperson[salesman] or agent shall be liable for separate penalties for any
violation of this section or Section 1 or 2 of this Act[issuance of a temporary tag prior to sale of the vehicle on
which the tag is placed by the dealer, for placement of a tag on a vehicle other than one purchased by the
purchaser shown on such tag, for failure to fully execute as provided in this section a temporary tag which is
placed upon a vehicle, and for failure to maintain the records required by KRS 186A.105].
Section 4. KRS 186A.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who knowingly gives false, fraudulent, or erroneous information in connection with an application
for the registration, and when required, titling of a vehicle, or any application for assignment of a vehicle
identification number, or replacement documents, or gives information in connection with his or her review of
applications, or falsely certifies the truthfulness and accuracy of information supplied in connection with the
registration and when required, titling of a vehicle, shall be guilty of forgery in the second degree.
(2) Any person who violates KRS 186A.260 or KRS 186A.275 to 186A.285 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(3) Any person who violates KRS 186A.300 to 186A.315 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(4) (a) Any person who operates a motor vehicle or trailer upon the highways of this state without a temporary
tag when one is required, or with one that is expired, improperly executed, or displayed on a vehicle
other than the one (1) to which it was legitimately and lawfully issued, shall be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who steals, fraudulently produces, copies, or acquires a temporary tag in a manner not
authorized under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(5) Any person who violates the disclosure provisions of KRS 186A.530(8) shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(6) Any person who violates any provisions of this chapter, or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, and for
which a specific penalty is not prescribed by statute, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(7) Criminal remedies or sanctions provided in this chapter are in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other
criminal remedies or sanctions provided elsewhere in the statutes.
(8) Any person who intentionally or willfully divulges his, her, or another person's certified inspector number to
any person other than those designated individuals within the offices of the sheriff, county clerk, or other state
office, except in the course of his or her official assigned duties, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(9) Any person who intentionally or willfully sells his, her, or another person's certified inspector number to any
person or persons shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(10) A motor vehicle dealer, salesperson, or agent who violates subsection (4) of this section or Section 1, 2, or 3
of this Act shall, in addition to the penalties prescribed in this section, be subject to the penalties in Section
5 of this Act.
Section 5. KRS 190.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any person who violates or causes, aids, or abets any
violation of any provision of KRS 190.010 to 190.080 and KRS Chapter 190A, as such provisions apply,
respectively, to new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers, distributors,
factory branches, or factory representatives, or any order, rule or regulation lawfully issued pursuant to
authority granted by KRS 190.010 to 190.080 shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more
than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. Any person who
violates paragraphs (l), (m) or (n) of subsection (1) of KRS 190.040 may also be subject to a suspension or
revocation sentence of not more than a year effective only in the territory formerly served by the unfairly
canceled dealer, except that in a metropolitan area serviced by several dealers handling the same motor vehicle
or recreational vehicle, the suspension or revocation order shall not be applicable to the remaining dealers.
(2) Any person who willfully and intentionally violates any provision of KRS 190.090 to 190.140 shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) A willful violation of KRS 190.100 or 190.110 by any person shall bar his or her recovery of any finance
charge, delinquency, or collection charge on the retail installment contract involved.
(4) Any person who willfully violates KRS 190.270 to 190.320 shall be subject to a penalty of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per violation, which may be recovered on behalf of the Commonwealth by the Attorney
General.
(5) Any person who willfully and fraudulently gives a false statement as to the total and actual consideration paid
for a motor vehicle under KRS 138.450 shall be guilty of a Class D felony and shall be fined not less than two
thousand dollars ($2,000) per offense.
(6) Any licensee who violates Section 1, 2, or 3 of this Act or subsection (4) of Section 4 of this Act may be
subject to the following penalties levied by the commission:
(a) For the first offense, a warning or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation;
(b) For the second offense within a two (2) year period, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
violation and a suspension of the licensee's license for up to one (1) year; and
(c) For the third offense within a two (2) year period, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
violation and a revocation of the licensee's license.
Section 6. KRS 186.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 186.020, 186.030, 186.040, 186.045(4), 186.050,
186.056, 186.060, 186.073, 186.110, 186.130, 186.140, 186.160, 186.170, 186.180(1) to (4)(a), 186.210(1),
186.230, or KRS 186.655 to 186.680 shall be guilty of a violation.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 138.465, 186.072, 186.190, 186.200, or 186.210(2)
shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) A person who violates the provisions of KRS 186.450(4), (5), or (6) or 186.452(3), (4), or (5) shall be guilty of
a violation. A person who violates any of the other provisions of KRS 186.400 to 186.640 shall be guilty of a
Class B misdemeanor.
(4) Any clerk or judge failing to comply with KRS 186.550(1) shall be guilty of a violation.
(5) If it appears to the satisfaction of the trial court that any offender under KRS 186.400 to 186.640 has a driver's
license but in good faith failed to have it on his or her person or misplaced or lost it, the court may, in its
discretion, dismiss the charges against the defendant without fine, imprisonment, or cost.
(6) Any person who steals a motor vehicle registration plate, temporary tag, or renewal decal shall be guilty of a
Class D felony. Displaying a canceled registration plate or temporary tag on a motor vehicle shall be prima
facie evidence of guilt under this section.
(7) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 186.1911 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(8) Any person who makes a false affidavit to secure a license plate under KRS 186.172 shall be guilty of a Class
A misdemeanor.
(9) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 186.070 or 186.150 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(10) Any person who operates a vehicle bearing a dealer's plate upon the highways of this Commonwealth with
intent to evade the motor vehicle usage tax or registration fee shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the
first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.
(11) Any person, other than a licensed dealer or manufacturer, who procures a dealer's plate with intent to evade the
motor vehicle usage tax or registration fee shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(12) Any resident who unlawfully registers, titles, or licenses a motor vehicle in any state other than Kentucky with
intent to evade the motor vehicle usage tax or the registration fee shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if
the amount of tax due is less than one hundred dollars ($100), or of a Class D felony if the amount of tax due
is more than one hundred dollars ($100), and in addition shall be liable for all taxes so evaded with applicable
interest and penalties.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.